District of Columbia statutes.
22-811

Contributing to the delinquency of a minor.

(a)

It is unlawful for an adult, being 4 or more years older than a minor, to invite, solicit, recruit, assist, support, cause, encourage, enable, induce, advise, incite, facilitate, permit, or allow the minor to:

(1)

Be truant from school;

(2)

Possess or consume alcohol or, without a valid prescription, a controlled substance as that term is defined in § 48-901.02(4);

(3)

Run away for the purpose of criminal activity from the place of abode of his or her parent, guardian, or other custodian;

(4)

Violate a court order;

(5)

Violate any criminal law of the District of Columbia for which the penalty constitutes a misdemeanor, except for acts of civil disobedience;

(6)

Join a criminal street gang as that term is defined in § 22-951(e)(1); or

(7)

Violate any criminal law of the District of Columbia for which the penalty constitutes a felony, or any criminal law of the United States, or the criminal law of any other jurisdiction that involves conduct that would constitute a felony if committed in the District of Columbia, except for acts of civil disobedience.

(b)

(1)

Except as provided in paragraphs (2), (4) and (5) of this subsection, a person convicted of violating subsection (a)(1)-(6) of this section shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or imprisoned for not more than 6 months, or both.

(2)

A person convicted of violating subsection (a)(2)-(6) of this section, having previously been convicted of an offense under subsection (a)(2)-(6) of this section or a substantially similar offense in this or any other jurisdiction, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 3 years, or both.

(3)

Except as provided in paragraphs (4) and (5) of this subsection, a person convicted of violating subsection (a)(7) of this section shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 5 years, or both.

(4)

A person convicted of violating subsection (a) of this section that results in serious bodily injury to the minor or any other person shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 5 years, or both.

(5)

A person convicted of violating subsection (a) of this section that results in the death of the minor or any other person shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 10 years, or both.

(c)

The penalties under this section are in addition to any other penalties permitted by law.

(d)

It is not a defense to a prosecution under this section that the minor does not engage in, is not charged with, is not adjudicated delinquent for, or is not convicted as an adult, for any conduct set forth in subsection (a)(1)-(7) of this section.

(e)

The Attorney General for the District of Columbia, or his or her assistants, shall prosecute a violation of subsection (a) of this section for which the penalty is set forth in subsection (c)(1) of this section.

(f)

For the purposes of this section, the term:

(1)

“Adult” means a person 18 years of age or older at the time of the offense.

(2)

“Minor” means a person under 18 years of age at the time of the offense.

Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 103, 53 DCR 8610
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 206(b), 60 DCR 2064
This section is referenced in § 7-403.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317, in (b), substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000” in (b)(1), for “not more than $3,000” in (b)(2), for “not more than $5,000” in (b)(3) and (b)(4), and for “not more than $10,000” in (b)(5).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 103 of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 206(b) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.